Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 2. Licensing Providers of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
§ 37.2-408.1.
Background check required; children’s residential facilities.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

37.2-416

, as a condition of employment, volunteering or providing services on a regular basis, every children’s residential facility that is regulated or operated by the Department shall require any person who (i) accepts a position of employment at such a facility, (ii) is currently employed by such a facility, (iii) volunteers for such a facility, or (iv) provides contractual services directly to a juvenile for such a facility to submit to fingerprinting and to provide personal descriptive information, to be forwarded along with the person’s fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information regarding the person. The children’s residential facility shall inform the person that he is entitled to obtain a copy of any background check report and to challenge the accuracy and completeness of any such report and obtain a prompt resolution before a final determination is made of the person’s eligibility to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children. The person shall provide the children’s residential facility with a written statement or affirmation disclosing whether he has ever been convicted of or is the subject of pending charges for any offense within or outside the Commonwealth.

The Central Criminal Records Exchange, upon receipt of a person’s record or notification that no record exists, shall forward it to the state agency that operates or regulates the children’s residential facility with which the person is affiliated. The state agency shall, upon receipt of a person’s record lacking disposition data, conduct research in whatever state and local recordkeeping systems are available in order to obtain complete data. The state agency shall report to the children’s facility whether the person is eligible to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children. Except as otherwise provided in subsection B, no children’s residential facility regulated or operated by the Department shall hire for compensated employment or allow to volunteer or provide contractual services persons who have been convicted of or are the subject of pending charges for (a) any offense set forth in clause (i), (ii), (iii), or (v) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or (b) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

(1) in the five years prior to the application date for employment, to be a volunteer, or to provide contractual services or (2) such person continues on probation or parole or has failed to pay required court costs for such offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

. The provisions of this section also shall apply to structured residential programs, excluding secure detention facilities, established pursuant to § 16.1-309.3 for juvenile offenders cited in a complaint for intake or in a petition before the court that alleges the juvenile is delinquent or in need of services or supervision.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, a children’s residential facility may hire for compensated employment or for volunteer or contractual service purposes persons who have been convicted of not more than one misdemeanor offense under §

18.2-57

or

18.2-57.2

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if 10 years have elapsed following the conviction, unless the person committed such offense in the scope of his employment, volunteer, or contractual services.

If the person is denied employment, or the opportunity to volunteer or provide services, at a children’s residential facility because of information appearing on his criminal history record, and the person disputes the information upon which the denial was based, upon written request of the person the state agency shall furnish the person the procedures for obtaining his criminal history record from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The information provided to the children’s residential facility shall not be disseminated except as provided in this section.

Those persons listed in clauses (i) through (iv) of subsection A also shall authorize the children’s residential facility to obtain a copy of information from the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

on any investigation of child abuse or neglect undertaken on him. The person shall provide the children’s residential facility with a written statement or affirmation disclosing whether he has ever been the subject of a founded case of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth. Children’s residential facilities regulated or operated by the Department shall not hire for compensated employment, or allow to volunteer or provide contractual services, persons who have a founded case of child abuse or neglect.

No person shall be allowed to work, volunteer, or provide services at a children’s residential facility unless (i) all components of the background check required pursuant to this section have been received by the children’s residential facility and (ii) the person is eligible to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children in accordance with subsections A and C.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, a children’s residential facility may employ a person specified in subsection A pending the results of the check of the central registry maintained by the Department pursuant to §

63.2-1515

required by this section, provided that (i) the person has received qualifying results on the fingerprint-based criminal history background check, (ii) the person does not work in the children’s residential facility or any other location where children placed in such facility are present, and (iii) such employment is permitted under 42 U.S.C. § 671 and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

The cost of obtaining the criminal history record and the central registry information shall be borne by the person unless the children’s residential facility, at its option, decides to pay the cost.

History.

2008, c. 873; 2012, cc. 383, 476, 507; 2016, c. 580; 2017, c. 809; 2019, cc. 100, 282; 2022, c. 729.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 873, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], the Board of Social Services, and the Board of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act no later than October 31, 2009.”

Acts 2008, c. 873, cl. 3 provides: “That the Standards for Interdepartmental Regulation of Children’s Residential Facilities (22 VAC 42-11-10 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until such time as each Board required to promulgate regulations pursuant to this act promulgates such regulations as required by this act. Upon promulgation of regulations by a Board as required by this act, the Standards for Interdepartmental Regulation of Children’s Residential Facilities shall cease to apply to facilities licensed and regulated by that Board.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 383, in subsection A, in the fourth sentence, inserted “a felony violation of a protective order as set out in § 16.1-253.2,” “or B” preceding “of §

18.2-47

,” and “a felony violation of a protective order as set out in §

18.2-60.4

.”

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “any person who” for “any individual who” preceding (i), “the person’s fingerprints” for “the applicant’s fingerprints” and “regarding the person” for “regarding such applicant” in the first sentence, substituted “person” for “applicant” in the second and third sentences of the first paragraph, and in the second paragraph, substituted “of a person’s record” for “of an individual’s record” in the first and second sentences, and “person” for “applicant” in the first and third sentences; in the second paragraph of subsection B, substituted “person” for “applicant” throughout, and “person’s” for “applicant’s” near the end of the second sentence; in subsection C, substituted “Those persons” for “Those individuals” at the beginning of the first sentence, “The person” for “The applicant” at the beginning of the second sentence, and “a person” for “an applicant” in the third sentence; and in subsection D, substituted “person” for “employee or volunteer.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 580 inserted “or an equivalent offense in another state” in clause (b) and added clause (d) in the second paragraph of subsection A and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809, in subsection A, rewrote the fourth sentence, which formerly listed specific criminal offenses; and inserted “or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction” in subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by c. 100, effective February 21, 2019, and c. 282, effective March 8, 2019, are nearly identical, and in the first paragraph in subsection A, deleted “who was not employed by that facility prior to July 1, 2008” at the end of clause (i), inserted clause (ii) and the clause (iii) designator, deleted “on a regular basis and will be alone with a juvenile in the performance of his duties who was not a volunteer at such facility prior to July 1, 2008” at the end of clause (iii), redesignated former clause (iii) as clause (iv), substituted “a facility” for “facility on a regular basis and will be alone with a juvenile in the performance of his duties who did not provide such services prior to July 1, 2008” in clause (iv) and substituted “in the children’s residential facility” for “with children” at the end of the paragraph; in the second paragraph in subsection B, deleted the second sentence which read “If the person has been permitted to assume duties that do not involve contact with children pending receipt of the report, the children’s residential facility is not precluded from suspending the person from his position pending a final determination of the person’s eligibility to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children”; and in subsection C, substituted “(i) through (iv)” for “(i), (ii), and (iii)” in the first sentence and deleted “alone with children” at the end of the third sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 729, effective April 27, 2022, deleted the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection A, which read: “The results of the criminal history background check must be received prior to permitting a person to work in the children’s residential facility.”; deleted the third sentence in subsection C, which read: “The children’s residential facility shall receive the results of the central registry search prior to permitting a person to work.”; redesignated former subsection D as subsection F; and added subsections D and E.

§ 37.2-409.
Intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual disability.

The Board may adopt regulations specifying the maximum number of individuals to be served by any intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disability (ICF/IID).

History.

2001, cc. 486, 506, § 37.1-189.2; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2017, c. 458.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals” for “consumers” and “individuals with intellectual disability (ICF/MR)” for “the mentally retarded.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 458 substituted “(ICF/IID)” for “(ICF/MR).”

§ 37.2-410.
Expiration of license; renewal; license fees.

Full licenses granted under this article may be issued for a period of one year or three successive years from the date of issuance and may be renewed by the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall issue a triennial license to a provider that has demonstrated full compliance with all applicable regulations of the Board related to health and safety of individuals receiving services during the previous licensing period and has demonstrated consistent compliance with all regulations of the Board during the previous 12-month period and the provider has taken steps satisfactory to the Department to prevent future violations and maintain full compliance with all applicable regulations during the three-year period. The Board may fix a reasonable fee for each license so issued and for any renewal thereof. All funds received by the Department under this article shall be paid into the general fund in the state treasury.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-256; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-181; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 1983, c. 67; 1992, c. 666; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716; 2014, c. 497.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 497 substituted “Full licenses” for “Licenses,” “a period of one year or” for “periods of up to,” and added the second sentence.

§ 37.2-411.
Inspections.

All services provided or delivered under any license shall be subject to review or inspection at any reasonable time by any authorized inspector or agent of the Department. The Commissioner or his authorized agents shall inspect all licensed providers and shall have access at all reasonable times to all services and records, including medical records. Records that are confidential under federal or state law shall be maintained as confidential by the Department and shall not be further disclosed except as permitted by law; however, there shall be no right of access to communications that are privileged pursuant to §

8.01-581.17

. The Commissioner shall call upon other state or local departments to assist in the inspections and those departments shall render an inspection report to the Commissioner. After receipt of all inspection reports, the Commissioner shall make the final determination with respect to the condition of the service so reviewed or inspected. The Commissioner or his authorized agents shall make at least one annual unannounced inspection of each service offered by each licensed provider. Inspections shall be focused on preventing specific risks to individuals receiving services, including an evaluation of the physical facilities in which the services are provided. In addition, the Commissioner shall promptly investigate all complaints. The Board may adopt and the Commissioner shall enforce reasonable regulations that may be necessary or proper to carry out the general purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-257; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-182; 1980, c. 582; 1992, c. 666; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Cross references.

As to inspection of hospitals by state agencies generally, see §

32.1-125.1

.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” in the seventh sentence.

§ 37.2-412.
Human rights review.

Licensing pursuant to this article shall be contingent upon substantial compliance with §

37.2-400

and acceptable implementation of the human rights regulations adopted pursuant thereto, as determined by periodic human rights reviews performed by the Department. Such reviews shall be conducted as part of the Department’s licensing reviews or, at the Department’s discretion, whenever human rights issues arise.

History.

1999, c. 969, § 37.1-182.3; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-413.
Necessity for supervision by licensed provider.

No person shall maintain or operate any service unless such service is under the direct supervision of a provider licensed under this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-258; 1950, p. 936; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-184; 1976, c. 671; 1979, c. 54; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-414.
Cure by mental or spiritual means without use of drugs or material remedy.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to authorize or require a license of a provider to establish, maintain and operate, or have charge of any service for the care and treatment of persons by the practice of the religious tenets of any church in the ministration to the sick and suffering by mental or spiritual means without the use of any drug or material remedy, whether gratuitously or for compensation, provided the statutes and regulations on sanitation and safety are complied with.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-259; 1960, c. 496; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-188; 1976, c. 671; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-415.
Provisional and conditional licenses.

The Commissioner may issue a provisional license at any time to a provider that has previously been fully licensed when the provider is temporarily unable to comply with all licensing standards. The maximum term of a provisional license shall be six months. A provisional license may be renewed for a period not to exceed six months if the provider is not able to demonstrate compliance with all licensing regulations but demonstrates progress towards compliance. However, in no case shall the total period of provisional licensure exceed 12 successive months. A provisional license shall be prominently displayed by the provider in a format determined by the Commissioner at the site of the affected service and shall indicate thereon the violations of licensing standards to be corrected and the expiration date of the license. Whenever the Commissioner issues a provisional license, the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) shall apply. Any person aggrieved by the final decision of the Commissioner to issue a provisional license shall be entitled to judicial review of such decision in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

The Commissioner may issue a conditional license to a provider to operate a new service in order to permit the provider to demonstrate compliance with all licensing standards. The maximum term of a conditional license shall be six months. A conditional license may be renewed, but in no case, whether renewed or not, shall the total period of conditional licensing be longer than 12 successive months.

History.

1980, c. 582, § 37.1-183.2; 1990, c. 311; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716; 2014, c. 497.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 118 C 2, as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

37.2-415

, Code of Virginia, and regulations 12VAC35-105-50A.1.b and 12VAC35-46-90.A, the Commissioner of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services or any authorized agent may extend the period of any conditional license issued by the department for up to six months beyond the duration of the Governor’s emergency declaration for COVID-19.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 497 in the first paragraph inserted “at any time” and “in a format determined by the Commissioner,” substituted “for a period not to exceed six months if the provider is not able to demonstrate compliance with all licensing regulations but demonstrates progress towards compliance. However, in” for “but in” and “licensure exceed” for “licensing be longer than,” deleted “whether renewed or not” following “no case,” and added the last two sentences.

§ 37.2-416.
Background checks required.

As used in this section:“Direct care position” means any position that includes responsibility for (i) treatment, case management, health, safety, development, or well-being of an individual receiving services or (ii) immediately supervising a person in a position with this responsibility.“Hire for compensated employment” does not include (i) a promotion from one adult substance abuse or adult mental health treatment position to another such position within the same licensee licensed pursuant to this article or (ii) new employment in an adult substance abuse or adult mental health treatment position in another office or program licensed pursuant to this article if the person employed prior to July 1, 1999, in a licensed program had no convictions in the five years prior to the application date for employment. “Hire for compensated employment” includes (a) a promotion or transfer from an adult substance abuse treatment position to any mental health or developmental services direct care position within the same licensee licensed pursuant to this article or (b) new employment in any mental health or developmental services direct care position in another office or program of the same licensee licensed pursuant to this article for which the person has previously worked in an adult substance abuse treatment position.“Shared living” means an arrangement in which the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance pays a portion of a person’s rent, utilities, and food expenses in return for the person residing with and providing companionship, support, and other limited, basic assistance to a person with developmental disabilities receiving medical assistance services in accordance with a waiver for whom he has no legal responsibility.

Every provider licensed pursuant to this article shall require (i) any applicant who accepts employment in any direct care position, (ii) any applicant for approval as a sponsored residential service provider, (iii) any adult living in the home of an applicant for approval as a sponsored residential service provider, (iv) any person employed by a sponsored residential service provider to provide services in the home, (v) any person who enters into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waiver, and (vi) any person under contract with the provider to serve in a direct care position to submit to fingerprinting and provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) for the purpose of obtaining national criminal history record information regarding the applicant. Except as otherwise provided in subsection C, D, or F, no provider licensed pursuant to this article shall:

Hire for compensated employment any person who has been convicted of (i) any offense set forth in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

(a) in the five years prior to the application date for employment or (b) if such person continues on probation or parole or has failed to pay required court costs for such offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

;

Approve an applicant as a sponsored residential service provider if the applicant, any adult residing in the home of the applicant, or any person employed by the applicant has been convicted of (i) any offense set forth in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in § 19.2-392.02 (a) in the five years prior to the application date to be a sponsored residential service provider or (b) if such applicant continues on probation or parole or has failed to pay required court costs for such offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in § 19.2-392.02;

Permit to enter into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waiver any person who has been convicted of (i) any offense set forth in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in § 19.2-392.02 or (ii) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in § 19.2-392.02 (a) in the five years prior to entering into a shared living arrangement or (b) if such person continues on probation or parole or has failed to pay required court costs for such offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in § 19.2-392.02; or

Allow any person under contract with the provider to serve in a direct care position who has been convicted of (i) any offense set forth in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in § 19.2-392.02 or (ii) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in § 19.2-392.02 (a) in the five years prior to the application date for employment or (b) if such person continues on probation or parole or has failed to pay required court costs for such offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in § 19.2-392.02.The Central Criminal Records Exchange, upon receipt of an applicant’s record or notification that no record exists, shall submit a report to the requesting authorized officer or director of a provider licensed pursuant to this article. If any applicant is denied employment because of information appearing on the criminal history record and the applicant disputes the information upon which the denial was based, the Central Criminal Records Exchange shall, upon written request, furnish to the applicant the procedures for obtaining a copy of the criminal history record from the FBI. The information provided to the authorized officer or director of a provider licensed pursuant to this article shall not be disseminated except as provided in this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, a provider may hire for compensated employment or permit any person under contract with the provider to serve in a direct care position or permit any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the provider to provide direct care services on behalf of the provider at adult substance abuse or adult mental health treatment programs a person who was convicted of any violation of §

18.2-51.3

; any misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-56

or

18.2-56.1

or subsection A of §

18.2-57

; any first offense misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-57

.2; any violation of §

18.2-60

,

18.2-89

,

18.2-92

, or

18.2-94

; any misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-282

,

18.2-346

, or

18.2-346.01

; any offense set forth in clause (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

, except an offense pursuant to subsections H1 and H2 of §

18.2-248

; or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if the hiring provider determines, based upon a screening assessment, that the criminal behavior was substantially related to the applicant’s substance abuse or mental illness and that the person has been successfully rehabilitated and is not a risk to individuals receiving services based on his criminal history background and his substance abuse or mental illness history.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, a provider may hire for compensated employment or permit any person under contract with the provider to serve in a direct care position or permit any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the provider to provide direct care services on behalf of the provider at adult substance abuse treatment facilities a person who has been convicted of not more than one offense under subsection C of §

18.2-57

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if (i) the person has been granted a simple pardon if the offense was a felony committed in Virginia, or the equivalent if the person was convicted under the laws of another jurisdiction; (ii) more than 10 years have elapsed since the conviction; and (iii) the hiring provider determines, based upon a screening assessment, that the criminal behavior was substantially related to the applicant’s substance abuse and that the person has been successfully rehabilitated and is not a risk to individuals receiving services based on his criminal history background and his substance abuse history.

The hiring provider and a screening contractor designated by the Department shall screen applicants who meet the criteria set forth in subsections C and D to assess whether the applicants have been rehabilitated successfully and are not a risk to individuals receiving services based on their criminal history backgrounds and substance abuse or mental illness histories. To be eligible for such screening, the applicant shall have completed all prison or jail terms, shall not be under probation or parole supervision, shall have no pending charges in any locality, shall have paid all fines, restitution, and court costs for any prior convictions, and shall have been free of parole or probation for at least five years for all convictions. In addition to any supplementary information the provider or screening contractor may require or the applicant may wish to present, the applicant shall provide to the screening contractor a statement from his most recent probation or parole officer, if any, outlining his period of supervision and a copy of any pre-sentencing or post-sentencing report in connection with the felony conviction. The cost of this screening shall be paid by the applicant, unless the licensed provider decides to pay the cost.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, a provider may (i) hire for compensated employment, (ii) approve as a sponsored residential service provider, (iii) permit to enter into a shared living arrangement, or (iv) permit any person under contract with the provider to serve in a direct care position on behalf of the provider or permit any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the provider to provide direct care services on behalf of the provider persons who have been convicted of not more than one misdemeanor offense under §

18.2-57

or

18.2-57.2

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if 10 years have elapsed following the conviction, unless the person committed the offense while employed in a direct care position. A provider may also approve a person as a sponsored residential service provider if (a) any adult living in the home of an applicant or (b) any person employed by the applicant to provide services in the home in which sponsored residential services are provided has been convicted of not more than one misdemeanor offense under §

18.2-57

or

18.2-57.2

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, if 10 years have elapsed following the conviction, unless the person committed the offense while employed in a direct care position.

Providers licensed pursuant to this article also shall require, as a condition of employment, approval as a sponsored residential service provider, permission to enter into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waiver, or permission for any person under contract with the provider to serve in a direct care position, written consent and personal information necessary to obtain a search of the registry of founded complaints of child abuse and neglect that is maintained by the Department of Social Services pursuant to §

63.2-1515

.

The cost of obtaining the criminal history record and search of the child abuse and neglect registry record shall be borne by the applicant, unless the provider licensed pursuant to this article decides to pay the cost.

A person who complies in good faith with the provisions of this section shall not be liable for any civil damages for any act or omission in the performance of duties under this section unless the act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a provider licensed pursuant to this article that provides services to individuals receiving services under the state plan for medical assistance services or any waiver thereto may disclose to the Department of Medical Assistance Services (i) whether a criminal history background check has been completed for a person described in subsection B for whom a criminal history background check is required and (ii) whether the person described in subsection B is eligible for employment, to provide sponsored residential services, to provide services in the home of a sponsored residential service provider, or to enter into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waiver.

Any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the provider and who will serve in a direct care position on behalf of the provider licensed pursuant to this article shall undergo a background check that shall include:

A criminal history records check through the Central Criminal Records Exchange pursuant to §

19.2-389

; and

A search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse and neglect.Except as otherwise provided in subsection C, D, or F, no provider licensed pursuant to this article shall permit any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the provider to provide direct care services on behalf of the provider if that person has been convicted of (i) any offense set forth in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

(a) in the five years prior to the application date for employment or (b) if such person continues on probation or parole or has failed to pay required court costs for such offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

.

History.

1999, c. 685, § 37.1-183.3; 2001, cc. 486, 506, 784; 2002, c. 712; 2003, c. 468; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 383, 407; 2011, c. 657; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2016, c. 574; 2017, cc. 458, 775, 809; 2018, c. 569; 2019, c. 89; 2020, c. 1092; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 188, 475.

Cross references.

As to licensed provider statement to prospective employer, see § 32.1-326.4.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 383 and 407 are identical, and inserted “or adult mental health” twice in the first sentence in the second paragraph of subsection A; in subsection C, inserted “or adult mental health” following “employment at adult substance abuse” near the beginning, inserted clause (iii), and inserted “or mental illness” twice near the end; inserted “or mental illness” near the end of the first sentence in subsection D; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 657, in the first paragraph in subsection B, substituted “subsection C, D, or F” for “subsections C or E”; made a minor stylistic change in subsection C; added subsection D; redesignated former subsection D as subsection E, and therein substituted “subsections C and D” for “subsection C”; and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “direct care position” for “direct consumer care position” and “an individual receiving services” for “a consumer” in the first paragraph, and “or developmental services direct care position” for “or mental retardation direct consumer care position” in (a) and (b) of the second paragraph; in subsection B, substituted “direct care position” for “direct consumer care position” in the first sentence of the first paragraph, and substituted “an applicant’s record” for “an individual’s record” in the first sentence of the second paragraph; substituted “individuals receiving services” for “consumers” near the end of subsection D and in the first sentence of subsection E; and substituted “direct care position” for “direct consumer care position” at the end of subsection F.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 574, in subsection A, divided the former first paragraph into the introductory language of subsection A and the definition for “Direct,” deleted “As used in this section” twice in the second paragraph, added the definition for “Shared living”; in subsection B, inserted the clause (i) and (a) designations and added clauses (ii)-(v) and (b) and (c); and substituted “approval as a sponsored residential service provider, or permission to enter into a shared living arrangement with a person receiving medical assistance services pursuant to a waive” for “for all applicants” in subsection G.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 458, in subsection A, deleted “intellectual or” preceding “developmental disabilities” in the definition of “Shared living.”

The 2017 amendment by c. 775, in subsection F, in the first sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation, inserted “(ii) approve as a sponsored residential service provider, or (iii) permit to enter into a shared living arrangement,” and added the last sentence.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809, in subsection B, rewrote the second sentence in the first paragraph, adding designations for subdivisions B 1 through B 3; rewrote subsections C and D; and inserted “or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction” in subsection F.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 569 inserted “18.2-89” in subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 89 added subsection J.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1092, inserted “if” at the beginning of clause (iv)(b) in subdivisions B 1, B 2, and B 3; in subsection C, substituted “treatment programs” for “treatment facilities,” and inserted “any first offense misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-57.2

,” and “any misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-282

or

18.2-346

”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 188, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “18.2-346, or

18.2-346.01

” for “or

18.2-346

” in subsection C.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 475, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B, inserted “and (vi) any person under contract with the provider to serve in a direct care position” in the introductory paragraph; added subdivision B 4; in subsections C and D, inserted “or permit any person under contract with the provider to serve in a direct care position or permit any person employed by a temporary agency that has entered into a contract with the provider to provide direct care services on behalf of the provider” and added similar language in clause (iv) of subsection F; in subsection G, inserted “or permission for any person under contract with the provider to serve in a direct care position”; added subsection K; and made stylistic changes.

§ 37.2-417.
Proceeding to prevent unlawful operation of service.

In case any service is being operated in violation of the provisions of this article or of any applicable regulations made under these provisions, the Commissioner, in addition to other remedies, may institute any appropriate action or proceedings against the provider to prevent the unlawful operation and to restrain, correct, or abate such violation or violations. Any action or proceeding shall be instituted in the circuit court of the county or city where the provider is located or conducts business, and the court shall have jurisdiction to enjoin the unlawful operation or the violation or violations.

History.

Code 1950, § 37-258.3; 1960, c. 496; 1968, c. 477, § 37.1-187; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 2001, cc. 486, 506; 2005, c. 716.